apertium-sme-smj.sme.lexc
! æ7 for Valkeapæ7æ7, a sub form not to be triggered by Valkeapää

! Aspell tags
! /A /B /C /D /E /F /G /H /I /J /K /L /M
! /N /O /P /Q /R /S /T /U /V /W /X /Y /Z

! Flag diacritics
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@  @D.NeedNoun.ON@  @C.NeedNoun@ ! (Dis)allowing compounds

! @P.Need3Part.ON@ @D.Need3Part.ON@ @C.Need3Part@ !3Part

 @U.Cap.Obl@  @U.Cap.Opt@			! Allowing downcasing of
        							! derived names: deatnulaš.
        							! Actually, downcasing should be obligatory

! Testing instruction:
! For testing purposes, the string !^C^ is added to every line that causes
! circularity. In order to use the "check-all" option of lexc (that lists all
! generated forms), the file  should be generated without the lines containing
! the sequence "^C^" This is done by the command "make rec-clean". The resulting
! binary file will be called nonrec-sme.save, and it will be stored in
! sme/int.

! Other similar textual flags include:
! !SUB = substandard forms
! ^P^  = pedagogical, i.e. forms to be removed for the pedagogical speller
! ^NG^ = not-generate, i.e. forms to be deprecated for natural language generation.
! ^N^  = Numerals, are removed with ^C^
! NOT-KJ = This form will not generated for the Kárášjohka dialect.
! NOT-GG = This form will not generated for the Guovdageaidnu dialect.
! NOT-GS = This form will not generated for the Gárasavvon dialect.





! Basic lexica, pointing to the other lexicon files
! =================================================


LEXICON Root
 +Use/Circ: Prefixes ;				  	! 
 +Cmpnd++Use/Circ:%- NounRoot ;	    ! 
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNoun ;   ! These flags are for
 @U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNoun ;   ! downcasing the propernouns
! AspellProp ;			    ! Only for aspell target !!
 NounRoot ;
! AspellAffix ;			    ! Only for aspell target !!
! ProperNounFirstPart ;	  ! Merged with ProperNoun, but kept as group
 AdjectiveRoot ;
 VerbRoot ;
 Copula ;
 Negativeverb ;
 Adverb ;
 Particles ;
 Subjunction ;
 Conjunction ;
 Adposition ;
 Interjection ;
 Pronoun ;
 +Use/CircN: Numeral ;			       !  Circular 
 Acronym ;
 Abbreviation ;
 Punctuation ;
! VEARA ;	!commented out to prevent the reading Der/veara when the word stands alone		       ! For a very exceptional adjective.
 Rmiddle ;                 ! gaskbeaivi, this is the "new" R, not Rreal




! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

LEXICON Prefixes	! ^C^
 ii%-+Use/Circ:ii%- AdjectiveRoot;        !    ii-biologalaš 
 ii%-+Use/Circ:ii%- NounRoot;			  !
 Lul^le%-+Use/Circ:Lul^le%- ProperNoun;        ! Lulli-Trøndelaga etc.
 Lul^li%-+Use/Circ:Lul^li%- ProperNoun;        !
 Lul^li^nuor^ta%-+Use/Circ:Lul^li^nuor^ta%- ProperNoun; !
 Mát^ta%-+Use/Circ:Mát^ta%- ProperNoun;        !
 Dav^vi%-+Use/Circ:Dav^vi%- ProperNoun;        !
 Dav^ve%-+Use/Circ:Dav^ve%- ProperNoun;        ! 76 i korpus, 17 i leksikon
 Gas^ka%-+Use/Circ:Gas^ka%- ProperNoun;       !
 Vuol^li%-+Use/Circ:Vuol^li%- ProperNoun;       !
 Vuol^le%-+Use/Circ:Vuol^le%- ProperNoun;       !
 Bad^je%-+Use/Circ:Bad^je%- ProperNoun;        !
 Oar^je%-+Use/Circ:Oar^je%- ProperNoun;        !
!Oar^jel%- ProperNoun ;       !^C^ Oarje 38 i korpus hard code oarjelsámi/-sápmelaš - brukes bare dær
 Orj^jel%-+Use/Circ:Orj^jel%- ProperNoun;       ! Orjje 0 i korpus  orjjelsápmi
 Orj^ješ%-+Use/Circ:Orj^ješ%- ProperNoun;       ! (vest)
 Mát^ta%-+Use/Circ:Mát^ta%- ProperNoun;        !
 Nuor^ta%-+Use/Circ:Nuor^ta%- ProperNoun;       ! (aust)
 Ođ^đa%-+Use/Circ:Ođ^đa%- ProperNoun;         !
 eah^pe#+Use/Circ:eah^pe# NounRoot;           !
 eah^pe#+Use/Circ:eah^pe# AdjectiveRoot;      !
 eah^pe#+Use/Circ:eah^pe# VerbRoot;           !

!"<Jus fylkkaboazodoallostivra gávnnaha ahte>"
!"<Ođđa siidaoasi dohkkeheami biehttaleami>"



LEXICON R ! lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp while investigating.
 Rreal ;  ! Business as usual: Normal compounds right on th Rreal
#                      Rmiddle ;

LEXICON Rmiddle
 al+ShCmp+Use/Sub:al           Rreal ;  !
 beai+ShCmp:beai       Rreal ;
 beal+ShCmp:beal       Rreal ;
 báldd+ShCmp+Use/Sub:báldd     Rreal ;  !
 gabb+ShCmp+Use/Sub:gabb	   Rreal ;  !
 garr+ShCmp+Use/Sub:garr	   Rreal ;  !
 gask+ShCmp+Use/Sub:gask	   Rreal ;  !
 geai+ShCmp+Use/Sub:geaj       Rreal ;  !
 geaš+ShCmp:geaš       Rreal ;
 gieh+ShCmp+Use/Sub:gieh       Rreal ;  !
 giet+ShCmp+Use/Sub:giet       Rreal ;  !
 guodd+ShCmp+Use/Sub:guodd     Rreal ;  !
 guoih+ShCmp+Use/Sub:guoih     Rreal ;  !
 guoikk+ShCmp+Use/Sub:guoikk   Rreal ;  !
 oahpaheai+ShCmp:oahpaheai  Rreal ;
 jot+ShCmp+Use/Sub:jot         Rinter ; !
 joh+ShCmp+Use/Sub:joh         Rreal ;  !
! #lih+ShCmp:lih	   Rreal ;
 liig+ShCmp+Use/Sub:liig	   Rreal ;  !
 miel+ShCmp:miel       Rreal ;
 mies+ShCmp+Use/Sub:mies	   Rreal ;  !
 muorr+ShCmp+Use/Sub:muorr     Rreal ;  !
! nii+ShCmp:nii        Rreal ;
 niib+ShCmp+Use/Sub:niib9	   Rreal ;  !
 njun+ShCmp+Use/Sub:njun       Rreal ;  !
 njár+ShCmp+Use/Sub:njár	   Rreal ;  !
 námm+ShCmp+Use/Sub:námm	   Rreal ;  !
 oaiv+ShCmp+Use/Sub:oaiv	   Rreal ;  !
 oai+ShCmp+Use/Sub:oai 	       Rreal ;  !
 ris+ShCmp+Use/Sub:ris	       Rreal ;  !
 sai+ShCmp+Use/Sub:sai         Rreal ;  !
 sis+ShCmp+Use/Sub:sis         Rreal ;  !
 vuohpp+ShCmp+Use/Sub:vuohpp   Rreal ;  !
 vuol+ShCmp:vuol       Rreal ;
 váh+ShCmp+Use/Sub:váh         Rreal ;  !
 vár+ShCmp+Use/Sub:vár         Rreal ;  !
 vát+ShCmp+Use/Sub:vát         Rreal ;  !
 čip+ShCmp+Use/Sub:čip	       Rreal ;  !
 čáz+ShCmp+Use/Sub:čáz	       Rreal ;  !
 šlubb+ShCmp+Use/Sub:šlubb     Rreal ;  !
 sáh+ShCmp+Use/Sub:sáh         Rreal ;  !
 sát+ShCmp+Use/Sub:sát         Rreal ;  !

LEXICON Rnoun
 Rreal ;
! Intermediate solution. Words pointing here come from
! the upper part of the NounRoot lexicon. They differ
! from inter in that they need a POS tag.

LEXICON Rinter
 Rreal ;
 +Use/Sub: # ;   !Kárášjot !

LEXICON Rreal ! This is the former R lexicon
 +Use/Circ: Rreal_nonhyph ;     !
 :%- Rreal_hyph ;

LEXICON Rreal_nonhyph   !^C^
 #+Use/Circ:# NounRoot;           ! This is the normal case.		         
 #+Use/Circ:# NounSecond;	        ! Testing some quasisuff, cf. noun file  
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ VerbRoot;           ! Flag diacr declares that the compound  
 #@P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ:#@P.NeedNoun.ON@ AdjectiveRoot;      ! needs a N tag later in the derivation 

LEXICON Rreal_hyph !
 #+Use/Circ:                 NounRoot ;                      ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so         
 #+Use/Circ:@P.NeedNoun.ON@  VerbRoot ;      ! Sem-julggaštus and the like	         
 #+Use/Circ:@P.NeedNoun.ON@  AdjectiveRoot ; ! is allowed.			                 
 #+Use/Circ:                 ProperNoun ;    ! pounds. Thus: London-Hull, Hull-viessu  are now ok.      
 +Cmpnd:             # ;            ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept.
                                     ! we want this in the speller
 +Der1+Der/lágan+Use/Circ:»lágan LAGAN ; ! ! biilalágan, joa, muhto maid biillalágan an. mielde...
                                     ! noaidelágán noaiddilágán beatnagalágán beanalágán all these goes
                                     ! Nielsen:beatnatlágán, beatnatlágáš, beanalágáš, giđalágáš, áhččelágáš,
 +Der1+Der/lágán+Use/Circ:»lágán LAGAN ; ! ! Oslolágán
 +Der1+Der/lágaš+Use/Circ:»lágaž LAGAN ; ! ! etc.
 +Der1+Der/lágáš+Use/Circ:»lágáž LAGAN ; !




! It seems the P flag in the AdjectiveRoot entry is irrelevant, since there
! are no N + [A-N] compounds. The pointers to AdjectiveRoot are temorarily
! (030129) left for inspection, they (line 3 and 6 of R) should be removed
! if no deadjectival nouns turn up.

!LEXICON R-middle
! :@P.Need3Part.ON@  NounRoot ;

!LEXICON R-end
! :@C.Need3Part@W3  NounRoot ;

LEXICON NounRoot
 áhkku#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:áhkku#beal%> Rreal ; !
 árga#beai:árga#beai Rnoun ;
 bađa#vuolli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:bađa#vuol%> Rreal ; !
 báráhistávvál:báráhistávvál%> R ;
 báráhistávvál+Use/Sub:báráhistávvál Rreal ; !
 baste#oai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:baste#oai%> Rreal ; !
 beassáš#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:beassáš#beai%> Rreal ; !
 beroštupmi+Use/Sub:beroštupmi Rreal ; !
 biegga#oai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:biegga#oai%> Rreal ; !
 boagán#oai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg+Use/Sub:boagán#oai%> Rreal ; !
boagán+N+CmpN/SgN:boagan%> R ;
 čiehka#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:čiehka#geaš%> Rreal ; !
 data#mašiidna+N+CmpN/SgN:data#mašen%> R ; !Alt.cmp.form
davvi+N+CmpN/SgN:davvi%> R ;
 dihto#miella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:dihto#miel%> Rreal ; !
 duogá#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:duogá#beal%> Rreal ; !
 duogá#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:duogá#beal%> Rreal ; !
 duopmo#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:duopmo#beai%> Rreal ; !
 duopmo#sotna#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:duopmo#sotna#beai%> Rreal ; !
 fáhcca#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:fáhcca#beal%> Rreal ; !
 fáhccat#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:fáhccat#beal%> Rreal ; !
 gádde#guorra+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:gádde#guor%> Rreal ; !
 gáhtaša#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:gáhtaša#beai%> Rreal ; !
 gaska#beai+Use/Sub:gaska#beai Rnoun ; !
 gaska#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:gaska#beai%> Rreal ; !
 gávllo#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:gávllo#beal%> Rreal ; !
 gazza#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:gazza#beal%> Rreal ; !
 gieđa#vuolli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:gieđa#vuol%> Rreal ; !
 giehta#beal:giehta#beal%> Rreal ;
 giehta#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:giehta#geaš%> Rreal ; !
 giehtat#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:giehtat#beal%> Rreal ; !
 giehtah#guhkit+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:giehtah9#guhkit R ; ! !
 giehtah#guhkit+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:giehtah9#guhkibu R ; !  !SUB!compound also for these 
 giehtah#guhkit+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:giehtah9#guhkibu R ;  !!compound also for these 
 giehtat#guhkit+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgN:giehtat#guhkit R ; !
 giehtat#guhkit+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:giehtat#guhkibu R ;  !!compound also for these 
 giehtat#guhkit+N+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/SgG:giehtat#guhkibu R ; !compound also for these 
 giehtah#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:giehtah#beal%> Rreal ; !
 giehtat#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:giehtat#beal%> Rreal ; !
 giellan#oai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:giellan#oai%> Rreal ; !
 girdin#mášiidna+N+CmpN/SgN:girdin#mášen%> R ; !Alt. cmp-form
 girje#oai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:girje#oai%> Rreal ; !
 goarrun#mášiidna+N+CmpN/SgN:goarrun#mášen%> R ; !Alt. cmp-form
 hárát#oai0vi+CmpN/Sg:hárát#oai%> Rreal ; !
 hearrá#beaivvit+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:hearrá#beai%> Rreal ; !
 iđit#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:iđit#beai%> Rreal ; !
 jallas#oai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:jallas#oai%> Rreal ; !
 johka#gát+Use/Sub:johka#gát Rreal ; !
 lasta#muor+Use/Sub:lasta#muor Rreal ; !
 loahppa#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:loahppa#geaš%> Rreal ; !
lulli+N+CmpN/SgN:lulli%> R ;
 luodda#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:luodda#geaš%> Rreal ; !
 máhka#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:máhka#beal%> Rreal ; !
 maŋŋil#gaska#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:maŋŋil#gaska#beai%> Rreal ; !
 mátta#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:mátta#geaš%> Rreal ; !
miella+N+Sg+Gen:miela Rmiddle ;
 namma#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:namma#beai%> Rreal ; !
náššuvdna:náššon%> R ;
 nieida#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:nieida#beal%> Rreal ; !
 nubbe#giella+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/SgN:nubbe#giella%> R ; !
 nubbe#giella+N+CmpN/SgG+DefSgNomCmp+CmpN/DefSgGen+CmpN/DefPlGen:nuppe#giela%> R ; !
 oalle#fávll+Use/Sub:oalle#fávll Rreal ; !
 pálbma#sotna#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:pálbma#sotna#beai%> Rreal ; !
 rihta#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:rihta#beal%> Rreal ; !
 ruoŧa:ruoŧa%>%- Rreal_nonhyph ;
 ruksa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/Sg:ruksa%> R ; !
 ruosmmes#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:ruosmmes#beai%> Rreal ; !
 ruksa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/Sg:ruksa%> R ; !
 sáme#giel+Use/Sub:sáme#giel Rreal ; !
 sárgun#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:sárgun#beal%> Rreal ; !
 seni^or+Use/Sub:seni^or Rreal ; !
 siessá#bealle+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:siessá#beal%> Rreal ; !
 skuvla#beai0vi+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:skuvla#beai%> Rreal ; !
 spábba#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:spábba#beal%> Rreal ; !
 suorbma#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:suorbma#geaš%> Rreal ; !
 viellja#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:viellja#beal%> Rreal ; !
 vuohppa#bealli+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:vuohppa#beal%> Rreal ; !
vuolli+N+CmpN/SgN:vuolli%> R ;
 vuoste#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:vuoste#geaš%> Rreal ; !
 vuostta#geah0či+N+CmpN/Sg+CmpN/Sg:vuostta#geaš%> Rreal ; !
